New York, session 2025-2026, S8030.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new 2 section 390.25 to read as follows: 3 § 390.25 Requirement of forensic psychological evaluation report; animal 4 cruelty. 5 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 6 the following meanings: 7 (a) "forensic psychological evaluation" means an evaluation conducted 8 by a mental health professional trained in forensic evaluation. 9 (b) "mental health professional" means a person licensed under article 10 one hundred fifty-three, one hundred fifty-four, or one hundred sixty- 11 three of the education law. 12 (c) "defendant", "conviction" and "sentence" includes, respectively, 13 an "eligible youth", a "youthful offender finding" and a "youthful 14 offender sentence" as those terms are defined in section 720.10 of this 15 chapter. 16 2. (a) In any case where the defendant is convicted of any offense 17 enumerated in section three hundred fifty-three, three hundred fifty- 18 three-a, or three hundred fifty-six of the agriculture and markets law 19 or subdivision four of section 130.20 of the penal law, the court must 20 order that the defendant submit to a forensic psychological evaluation. 21 The mental health professional performing such evaluation shall submit a 22 report of their findings to the court prior to sentencing. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13084-01-5 S. 8030 2 1 (b) In any case where the defendant is convicted of any offense 2 enumerated in article twenty-six of the agriculture and markets law 3 other than section three hundred fifty-three, three hundred 4 fifty-three-a, or three hundred fifty-six, the court may order that the 5 defendant submit to a forensic psychological evaluation. The mental 6 health professional performing such evaluation shall submit a report of 7 their findings and recommendations to the court prior to sentencing. 8 3. A forensic psychological evaluation ordered by the court under this 9 section shall include, but not be limited to, the mental health profes- 10 sional performing such evaluation endeavoring to identify: 11 (a) any causal factors underlying the animal cruelty offense; 12 (b) a risk assessment of the defendant's likelihood to recidivate and 13 any risk the defendant poses to the community at large; and 14 (c) sentencing recommendations for any counseling, humane education, 15 rehabilitation program, or other treatment which may address the under- 16 lying causal factors of the offense, or reduce the risk, if any, the 17 defendant poses to animals or to the community. 18 4. All costs of the forensic psychological evaluation shall be borne 19 by the defendant. However, if the court determines the defendant is 20 indigent, the state shall bear the cost of such evaluation. 21 § 2. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 60.14 to read as 22 follows: 23 § 60.14 Authorized disposition; animal cruelty. 24 1. When a person is convicted of any offense enumerated in article 25 twenty-six of the agriculture and markets law or subdivision four of 26 section 130.20 of this chapter, such sentence may, where appropriate and 27 after considering the findings and recommendations in any report submit- 28 ted to the court under section 390.25 of the criminal procedure law, 29 include an order requiring the defendant to attend counseling, humane 30 education, a rehabilitation program, or other such treatment which the 31 court deems appropriate. Such counseling, humane education, rehabili- 32 tation program, or other such treatment may be conducted in person or 33 remotely. 34 2. All costs of the counseling, humane education, rehabilitation 35 program, or other such treatment shall be borne by the defendant. Howev- 36 er, if the court determines the defendant is indigent, the state shall 37 bear the cost of such counseling, humane education, rehabilitation 38 program, or other such treatment. 39 § 3. The family court act is amended by adding a new section 347.2 to 40 read as follows: 41 § 347.2. Required forensic psychological evaluation; animal cruelty. 42 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 43 following meanings: 44 (a) "forensic psychological evaluation" means an evaluation conducted 45 by a mental health professional trained in forensic evaluation. 46 (b) "mental health professional" means a person licensed under article 47 one hundred fifty-three, one hundred fifty-four, or one hundred sixty- 48 three of the education law. 49 2. (a) In any proceeding where the respondent is found pursuant to 50 section 345.1 or 346.1 of this part to have committed any offense 51 enumerated in section three hundred fifty-three, three hundred fifty- 52 three-a, or three hundred fifty-six of the agriculture and markets law 53 or subdivision four of section 130.20 of the penal law, the court must 54 order that the respondent submit to a forensic psychological evaluation. 55 The mental health professional performing such evaluation shall submit a S. 8030 3 1 report of their findings to the court prior to the court issuing an 2 order of disposition. 3 (b) In any proceeding where the respondent is found pursuant to 4 section 345.1 or 346.1 of this part to have committed any offense 5 enumerated in article twenty-six of the agriculture and markets law 6 other than section three hundred fifty-three, three hundred 7 fifty-three-a, or three hundred fifty-six, the court may order that the 8 respondent submit to a forensic psychological evaluation. The mental 9 health professional performing such evaluation shall submit a report of 10 their findings and recommendations to the court prior to the court issu- 11 ing an order of disposition. 12 3. A forensic psychological evaluation ordered by the court under this 13 section shall include, but not be limited to, the mental health profes- 14 sional performing such evaluation endeavoring to identify: 15 (a) any causal factors underlying the animal cruelty offense; 16 (b) a risk assessment of the respondent's likelihood to recidivate and 17 any risk the respondent poses to the community at large; and 18 (c) sentencing recommendations for any counseling, humane education, 19 rehabilitation program, or other treatment which may address the under- 20 lying causal factors of the offense, or reduce the risk, if any, the 21 respondent poses to animals or to the community. 22 § 4. The family court act is amended by adding a new section 353.8 to 23 read as follows: 24 § 353.8. Required treatment; animal cruelty. 1. When a respondent is 25 found to have committed any offense enumerated in article twenty-six of 26 the agriculture and markets law or subdivision four of section 130.20 of 27 the penal law, such disposition may, where appropriate and after consid- 28 ering the findings and recommendations in any report submitted to the 29 court under section 347.2 of this article, include an order requiring 30 the respondent to attend counseling, humane education, a rehabilitation 31 program, or other such treatment which the court deems appropriate. Such 32 counseling, humane education, rehabilitation program, or other such 33 treatment may be conducted in person or remotely. 34 2. All costs of the counseling, humane education, rehabilitation 35 program, or other such treatment shall be borne by the respondent. 36 However, if the court determines the respondent is indigent, the state 37 shall bear the cost of such counseling, humane education, rehabilitation 38 program, or other such treatment. 39 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 40 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 41 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 42 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 43 on or before such effective date.